Utah statutes.
41-6a-1715.   Careless driving defined and prohibited.

(1)  A person operating a motor vehicle is guilty of careless driving if the person:

(a)  commits two or more moving traffic violations under this chapter in a series of acts within a single continuous period of driving covering three miles or less in total distance; or

(b)  commits a moving traffic violation under this chapter other than a moving traffic violation under Part 6, Speed Restrictions, while being distracted by one or more activities taking place within the vehicle that are not related to the operation of a motor vehicle, including:

(i)  using a wireless telephone or other electronic device unless the person is using hands-free talking and listening features while operating the motor vehicle;

(ii)  searching for an item in the vehicle; or

(iii)  attending to personal hygiene or grooming.

(2)  A violation of this section is a class C misdemeanor.

(3)  In addition to the penalty provided under this section or any other section, a judge may order the revocation of the convicted person's driver license if the violation causes or results in the death of another person in accordance with Subsection 53-3-218(6).

